Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Broker-Dealers, Agents, Investment Advisers, Investment Adviser Representatives, and Federal Covered Investment Advisers.
Sec. 45.56.420.
Post registration requirements.

Subject to 15 U.S.C. 78o(i) or 80b-18a, a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may establish minimum financial requirements for broker-dealers registered or required to be registered under this chapter and investment advisers registered or required to be registered under this chapter.

Subject to 15 U.S.C. 78o(i) or 80b-18a, a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall file the financial reports required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter. If the information contained in a record filed under this subsection is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment.

Subject to 15 U.S.C. 78o(i) or 80b-18a,

a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall make and maintain the accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter;

broker-dealer records required to be maintained under (1) of this subsection may be maintained in any form of data storage acceptable under 15 U.S.C. 78q(a) if they are readily accessible to the administrator; and

investment adviser records required to be maintained under (1) of this subsection may be maintained in any form of data storage required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

The records of a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and of an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter are subject to the reasonable periodic, special, or other audits or inspections by a representative of the administrator, in or outside this state, that the administrator considers necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. An audit or inspection may be made at any time and without prior notice. The administrator may copy and remove for audit or inspection copies of all records the administrator reasonably considers necessary or appropriate to conduct the audit or inspection. The administrator may assess a reasonable charge for conducting an audit or inspection under this subsection.

Subject to 15 U.S.C. 78o(i) or 80b-18a, a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require a broker-dealer or investment adviser that has custody of or discretionary authority over funds or securities of a customer or client to obtain insurance or post a bond or other satisfactory form of security in an amount established by a regulation adopted under this chapter. The administrator may determine the requirements of the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security. Insurance or a bond or other satisfactory form of security may not be required of a broker-dealer registered under this chapter whose net capital exceeds, or of an investment adviser registered under this chapter whose minimum financial requirements exceed, the amounts required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter. The insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security must permit an action by a person to enforce any liability on the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security if instituted within the time limitations in AS

45.56.710(j)(2)

.

Subject to 15 U.S.C. 78o(i) or 80b-18a, an agent may not have custody of funds or securities of a customer except under the supervision of a broker-dealer, and an investment adviser representative may not have custody of funds or securities of a client except under the supervision of an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser. A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may prohibit, limit, or impose conditions on a broker-dealer regarding custody of funds or securities of a customer and on an investment adviser regarding custody of securities or funds of a client.

With respect to an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter, a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require that information or other records be furnished or disseminated to clients or prospective clients in this state as necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors and advisory clients.

A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require an individual registered under AS

45.56.330

or

45.56.350

to participate in a continuing education program approved by the Securities and Exchange Commission and administered by a self-regulatory organization, or, in the absence of a continuing education program, a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require continuing education for an individual registered under AS

45.56.350

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.475; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.430.
Protecting older and vulnerable adults from financial exploitation.

If a broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual reasonably believes that the financial exploitation of a covered adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, or is being attempted, the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual shall notify adult protective services and the administrator not later than five days after the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual develops the reasonable belief that the financial exploitation or attempted financial exploitation has or may have occurred, or is being attempted, except that the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual shall notify adult protective services and the administrator immediately upon confirmation of the financial exploitation or attempted financial exploitation of the covered adult.

The requirements of (a) of this section may not be construed to require more than one notification for each occurrence of exploitation or attempted exploitation.

If a broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual reasonably believes that financial exploitation of a covered adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, or is being attempted, a broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual may notify a person whom the covered adult previously designated to be notified about financial matters of the covered adult, as well as any other person allowed under state or federal law or regulation, or the rules of a self-regulatory organization, except that the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual may not notify a person that is suspected of engaging in financial exploitation or other abuse of the covered adult.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser may delay a disbursement from an account of a covered adult or from an account on which a covered adult is a beneficiary if

the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual reasonably believes, after initiating an internal review of the requested disbursement and the suspected financial exploitation of a covered adult, that the requested disbursement may result in financial exploitation of the covered adult; and

the broker-dealer or investment adviser

within two business days after receiving the request for disbursement, provides written notification of the delay and the reason for the delay to all persons authorized to transact business on the account, except to a person that the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual reasonably believes has engaged in suspected or attempted financial exploitation of the covered adult;

within two business days after receiving the request for disbursement, notifies adult protective services and the administrator; and

continues as necessary an internal review of the suspected or attempted financial exploitation of the covered adult and, within seven business days after receiving the request for disbursement, reports the status of the investigation to adult protective services and the administrator, and provides additional status updates to the administrator and adult protective services upon request.

A disbursement delay under (d) of this section expires when the earlier of the following events occurs:

the broker-dealer or investment adviser determines that the disbursement will not result in financial exploitation of the covered adult;

15 business days after the date on which the broker-dealer or investment adviser first delayed the disbursement, unless

adult protective services or the administrator requests that the broker-dealer or investment adviser extend the delay, in which case the delay expires 25 business days after the date on which the broker-dealer or investment adviser first delayed disbursement; or

adult protective services, the administrator, or the superior court terminates the delay.

Adult protective services, the administrator, the broker-dealer or investment adviser that initiated the delay under (d) or (e) of this section, or another interested person may petition the superior court for an order extending a disbursement delay or providing other relief to a covered adult, and the superior court may enter an order providing the requested relief.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser shall provide access to or copies of records that are relevant to the suspected or attempted financial exploitation of a covered adult to adult protective services and to state law enforcement agencies as part of a referral to adult protective services or an investigation. The records that may be accessed or copied under this subsection include records relating to past transactions that may have involved financial exploitation of the covered adult as well as records relating to the most recent transaction that may involve financial exploitation of the covered adult. Records made available to agencies under this subsection are not public records as defined in AS

40.25.220

. This subsection does not limit or impede the authority of the administrator to access or examine the books and records of broker-dealers and investment advisers as otherwise provided by law.

A broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual acting in good faith and exercising reasonable care under (a) — (g) of this section is immune from administrative or civil liability for a notification, disclosure, disbursement delay, or record sharing under (a) — (g) of this section.

The following constitute the financial exploitation of a covered adult under this section:

the wrongful or unauthorized taking, withholding, appropriation, or use of the money, assets, or other property of a covered adult; or

an act or omission of a person, including an act or omission made through the use of a power of attorney, guardianship, or conservatorship of a covered adult, to

obtain control, through deception, intimidation, or undue influence, over the covered adult’s money, assets, or other property to deprive the covered adult of the ownership, use, benefit, or possession of the covered adult’s money, assets, or other property; or

convert the ownership, use, benefit, or possession of the covered adult’s money, assets, or other property to another person.

In this section,

“adult protective services” means the agency that has the responsibility for providing protective services for adults; in this paragraph,

“agency” has the meaning given in AS

44.64.200

;

“protective services” has the meaning given in AS

47.24.900

;

“covered adult” means a natural person who is

60 years of age or older; or

a vulnerable adult;

“qualified individual” means an agent, investment adviser representative, or other person who is acting in a supervisory, compliance, or legal capacity for a broker-dealer or investment adviser.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.480; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.440.
Denial, revocation, suspension, withdrawal, restriction, condition, or limitation of registration.

If the administrator finds that the order is in the public interest and (d) of this section authorizes the action, an order issued under this chapter may deny an application, or may condition or limit registration of an applicant to be a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, and, if the applicant is a broker-dealer or investment adviser, of a partner, officer, director, or person having a similar status or performing similar functions, or a person directly or indirectly in control, of the broker-dealer or investment adviser.

If the administrator finds that the order is in the public interest and (d) of this section authorizes the action, an order issued under this chapter may revoke, suspend, condition, or limit the registration of a registrant, and, if the registrant is a broker-dealer or investment adviser, of a partner, officer, director, or person having a similar status or performing similar functions, or a person directly or indirectly in control, of the broker-dealer or investment adviser. However, the administrator may not

institute a revocation or suspension proceeding under this subsection based on an order issued under a law of another state that is reported to the administrator or a designee of the administrator more than three years after the date of the order on which it is based; or

under (d)(5)(A) and (B) of this section, issue an order based on an order issued under the securities act of another state unless the other order was based on conduct for which (d) of this section would authorize the action had the conduct occurred in this state.

If the administrator finds that the order is in the public interest and (d)(1) — (6), (8) — (10), (12), or (13) of this section authorize the action, an order under this chapter may censure, impose a bar, or impose a civil penalty of not more than $100,000 for a single violation on a registrant and, if the registrant is a broker-dealer or investment adviser, on a partner, officer, director, or person having a similar status or performing similar functions, or on a person directly or indirectly in control of the broker-dealer or investment adviser.

A person may be disciplined under (a) — (c) of this section if the person

has filed, within the previous 10 years under this chapter or former AS 45.55, an application for registration in this state that, as of the effective date of registration or as of any date after filing in the case of an order denying effectiveness, was incomplete in any material respect or contained a statement that, in light of the circumstances under which it was made, was false or misleading with respect to a material fact;

wilfully violated or wilfully failed to comply with this chapter or former AS 45.55 or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter or former AS 45.55 within the previous 10 years;

has been convicted of a felony or within the previous 10 years has been convicted of a misdemeanor involving a security, a commodity future or option contract, or an aspect of a business involving securities, commodities, investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance;

is enjoined or restrained by a court of competent jurisdiction in an action instituted by the administrator under this chapter or former AS 45.55, by a state, by the Securities and Exchange Commission, or by the United States from engaging in or continuing an act, practice, or course of business involving an aspect of a business involving securities, commodities, investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance;

is the subject of an order issued after notice and opportunity for hearing by

the securities or other financial services regulator of a state or the Securities and Exchange Commission or other federal agency denying, revoking, barring, or suspending registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or investment adviser representative;

the securities regulator of a state or the Securities and Exchange Commission against a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or federal covered investment adviser;

the Securities and Exchange Commission or a self-regulatory organization suspending or expelling the registrant from membership in the self-regulatory organization;

a court adjudicating a United States Postal Service fraud order;

the insurance regulator of a state denying, suspending, or revoking registration as an insurance agent; or

a depository institution or financial services regulator suspending or barring the person from the depository institution or other financial services business;

is the subject of an adjudication or determination, after notice and opportunity for hearing, by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, the Federal Trade Commission, a federal depository institution regulator, or a depository institution, insurance, or other financial services regulator of a state that the person wilfully violated 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933), 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934), 15 U.S.C. 80b-1 — 80b-21 (Investment Advisers Act of 1940), 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940), or 7 U.S.C. 1 — 27 (Commodity Exchange Act), the securities or commodities law of a state, or a federal or state law under which a business involving investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance is regulated;

is insolvent, either because the person’s liabilities exceed the person’s assets or because the person cannot meet the person’s obligations as they mature, but the administrator may not enter an order against an applicant or registrant under this paragraph without a finding of insolvency as to the applicant or registrant;

refuses to allow or otherwise impedes the administrator from conducting an audit or inspection under AS

45.56.420(d)

or refuses access to a registrant’s office to conduct an audit or inspection under AS

45.56.420(d)

;

has failed to reasonably supervise an agent, investment adviser representative, or other individual, if the agent, investment adviser representative, or other individual was subject to the person’s supervision and committed a violation of this chapter or former AS 45.55 or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter or former AS 45.55;

has not paid the proper filing fee within 30 days after having been notified by the administrator of a deficiency, but the administrator shall vacate an order under this paragraph when the deficiency is corrected;

after notice and opportunity for a hearing, has been found

by a court of competent jurisdiction to have wilfully violated the laws of a foreign jurisdiction under which the business of securities, commodities, investment, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance is regulated;

to have been the subject of an order of a securities regulator of a foreign jurisdiction denying, revoking, or suspending the right to engage in the business of securities as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or similar person; or

to have been suspended or expelled from membership by or participation in a securities exchange or securities association operating under the securities laws of a foreign jurisdiction;

is the subject of a cease and desist order issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission or issued under the securities, commodities, investment, franchise, banking, finance, or insurance laws of a state;

has engaged in dishonest or unethical practices in the securities, commodities, investment, franchise, banking, finance, or insurance business;

is not qualified based on factors that may include training, experience, and knowledge of the securities business; however, in the case of an application by an agent for a broker-dealer that is a member of a self-regulatory organization or by an individual for registration as an investment adviser representative, a denial order may not be based on this paragraph if the individual has successfully completed all examinations required by (e) of this section; the administrator may require an applicant for registration under AS

45.56.330

or

45.56.350

who has not been registered in a state within the two years preceding the filing of an application in this state to complete successfully an examination; or

is a person whose license issuance or renewal is denied under AS

25.27.244

.

A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require that an examination, including an examination developed or approved by an organization of securities regulators, be successfully completed by a class of individuals or all individuals. An order issued under this chapter may waive, in whole or in part, an examination as to an individual and a regulation adopted under this chapter may waive, in whole or in part, an examination as to a class of individuals if the administrator determines that the examination is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors.

The administrator may suspend or deny an application summarily; restrict, condition, limit, or suspend a registration; or censure, bar, or impose a civil penalty on a registrant before final determination of an administrative proceeding. Upon the issuance of an order, the administrator shall promptly notify each person subject to the order that the order has been issued, the reasons for the action, and that, within 15 days after the receipt of a request in a record from the person, the matter will be scheduled for a hearing. If a hearing is not requested and none is ordered by the administrator within 30 days after the date of service of the order, the order becomes final by operation of law. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the administrator, after notice of and opportunity for hearing to each person subject to the order, may modify or vacate the order or extend the order until final determination.

An order may not be issued under this section, except under (f) of this section, without appropriate notice to the applicant or registrant, and an opportunity for hearing under AS

45.56.690(c)

.

A person that controls, directly or indirectly, a person not in compliance with this section may be disciplined by order of the administrator under (a) — (c) of this section to the same extent as the noncomplying person, unless the controlling person did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of conduct that is a ground for discipline under this section.

The administrator may not institute a proceeding under (a) — (c) of this section based solely on material facts actually known by the administrator unless an investigation or the proceeding is instituted within one year after the administrator actually acquires knowledge of the material facts.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.485; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

In 2018, in paragraph (d)(15), “whose license renewal is denied under AS

14.43.148

or” was removed in order to reconcile sec. 34, ch. 23, SLA 2018, and sec. 25, ch. 65, SLA 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.